Hawaii statutes.
[§353-36] Release of misdemeanants to
prevent overcrowding. [Section repealed July 1, 2020. L 2016, c 217,
§8.] (a) Notwithstanding chapter 804 and any other law to the contrary
and except as provided in subsection (b), the director may order the release of
a misdemeanant on recognizance to prevent overcrowding when a community
correctional center has reached capacity, as determined by the director. The
director shall consider the circumstances and nature of the misdemeanant's
charge or offense prior to ordering a release pursuant to this section. The
director's order shall supersede and have the same force and effect as an order
entered by a court pursuant to chapter 804. For purposes of this section and
section 353-37, "misdemeanant" means a person incarcerated at a
community correctional center who has been charged with a petty misdemeanor or
misdemeanor, or an incarcerated person who has been sentenced pursuant to
section 706-663.

(b) No person who is incarcerated under any of
the following circumstances shall be eligible for release pursuant to this
section:

(1) The person has been denied bail or whose bail has
been set at more than $5,000 pursuant to chapter 804;

(2) The person is charged with or convicted of or is
on probation or parole for a serious crime, as defined in section 804-3;

(3) The person has been arrested or convicted for
abuse of family or household members, as defined in section 709-906; or

(4) Other than the offense for which release is
contemplated under this section, the person has been previously convicted of
any offense, as defined in title 37, that involves injury or threat of injury
to the person of another, including but not limited to sexual harassment in the
fourth degree, harassment by stalking, violation of an order of protection, or
violation of a temporary restraining order.

(c) The authority to release a misdemeanant
pursuant to this section is granted solely for the purpose of managing the
population of the community correctional centers. Nothing in this section
shall be construed as granting any person the right to be released. An order
releasing a misdemeanant pursuant to this section shall not operate to dismiss
or otherwise terminate any charges then pending against the misdemeanant.

(d) The director shall notify the court where
the case is assigned and the prosecuting attorney of the release of any
misdemeanant pursuant to this section not later than forty-eight hours prior to
the time of the actual release.

(e) The State or any of its officers and employees
shall not be subject to any civil liability or penalty nor to any criminal
prosecution for any error in judgment or discretion made in good faith and upon
reasonable grounds in any action taken or omitted by the State or any of its
officers and employees acting in their official capacity pursuant to this
section.

(f) The director shall adopt policies and
procedures for the release of misdemeanants pursuant to this section. [L 2016,
c 217, pt of §1]

Note

Section applies only to persons charged with offenses subject
to sentencing in §706-663, on or after July 1, 2016. L 2016, c 217, §4.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next